Maryland, session 2025, HB1221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–02.
(a) A contract for the initial sale of a cooperative interest to a member of the public
for residential use is not enforceable against the initial purchaser unless:
(1) The initial purchaser is given at or before the time a contract is entered
into between the developer and the initial purchaser, a public offering statement containing
all of the information required by this section; and
(2) The contract contains, in conspicuous type, a notice of the initial
purchaser’s right to receive a public offering statement and the rescission rights provided
under this title.
(b) The public offering statement shall contain at least the following:
(1) The name and address of the developer;
(2) The following statements:
(i) A boundary survey or metes–and–bounds description of the
cooperative project together with a location survey of all improvements, including
recreational facilities, streets, and roads, and a drawing of any proposed improvements not
yet constructed within the cooperative project;
(ii) A statement of the form of ownership of all real and personal
property which is intended by the developer to be owned or leased by the cooperative
housing corporation;
(iii) A statement as to whether streets abutting the cooperative
project are to be dedicated to public use or maintained by the cooperative housing
corporation;
(iv) A statement of the projected completion dates for proposed
improvements and, in the case of a contract for the initial sale of a cooperative interest in
a cooperative housing corporation which has not yet been formed, a statement of the
projected date of formation;
(v) A statement whether and under what conditions units may be
sublet or cooperative interests sold by members;

HOUSE BILL 1221 3
(vi) A description of the voting and other rights in the cooperative
housing corporation which attach to a cooperative interest as such rights are described in
§ 2–105 of this article;
(vii) An opinion, based on stated factual assumptions, as to whether
the members under current laws will be entitled to a pass–through of deductions from
federal and State income taxes for payments made by the cooperative housing corporation
for real estate taxes and interest on the property of the cooperative housing corporation;
(viii) A statement of the rights and responsibilities of members
regarding the blanket encumbrance and a statement as to the nature and extent of any
protection to the initial purchaser if the developer or cooperative housing corporation
defaults on such a blanket encumbrance after transfer or a statement that there is no such
protection;
(ix) A statement that a deposit made in connection with the purchase
of a cooperative interest will be held in an escrow account in the same manner as provided
in § 10–301 of the Real Property Article in the case of sales of new, uncompleted single
family units;
(x) A statement of any fees required by the cooperative housing
corporation in connection with the transfer of membership or issuance of a proprietary
lease;
(xi) A statement of the common charges, known or anticipated,
however denominated, which may be levied against a member;
(xii) A statement of the cooperative interest associated with each unit
and the underlying debt responsibility associated with each unit on a pro rata basis, if
applicable;
(xiii) A statement as to whether the cooperative housing corporation
has or will obtain insurance coverage for casualty, property damage, and public liability
and if so, in what amounts;
(xiv) In the case of a cooperative housing corporation containing
buildings substantially completed more than 5 years prior to the date of the notice required
under § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle, a statement of the physical condition and state of repair
of the major structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing components of the
improvements, to the extent reasonably ascertainable, the estimated costs of repairs for
which a present need is disclosed in the statement, and a statement of repairs which the
developer intends to make. The developer is entitled to rely on the reports of architects or
engineers authorized to practice their profession in this State; and
(xv) A statement of all warranties and disclaimers being made to the
initial purchaser and to the cooperative housing corporation by the developer;

HOUSE BILL 1221
(3) Copies of the proposed or final:
(i) Contract of sale;
(ii) Membership certificate;
(iii) Proprietary lease;
(iv) Articles of incorporation;
(v) Bylaws;
(vi) Rules, if any;
(vii) Floor plans;
(viii) Blanket encumbrances;
(ix) Member loan documents and any contract, note, mortgage given
to the developer, or other instrument to be entered into with the developer as part of the
initial sale;
(x) Any lease other than the proprietary lease to a third party of real
or personal property to which the cooperative housing corporation is a party; and
(xi) Any management contract, employment contract, or other
contract excluding contracts of insurance affecting the use, maintenance or access to all or
part of the real or personal property of the cooperative housing corporation;
(4) A copy of the projected annual operating budget for the cooperative
housing corporation including, where applicable:
(i) Insurance;
(ii) Administration;
(iii) Maintenance;
(iv) Utilities;
(v) General expenses;
(vi) Reserves;
(vii) Capital items;
(viii) Debt service; and

HOUSE BILL 1221 5
(ix) Taxes; and
(5) If applicable, a copy of the notice and materials required by § 5–6B–05
of this subtitle, and a copy of the financial standards required to be established under §
5–6B–06(a)(2)(i) of this subtitle.
(c) Statements required in this section may be summarized or produced in a
collection of documents which effectively conveys the required information to the initial
purchaser.
(D) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION SHALL MAINTAIN ON THE WEBSITE OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, NOT INCLUDING INFORMATION PERTAINING TO AN INDIVIDUAL UNIT.
(2) THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED IN A DOWNLOADABLE FORMAT AND AT NO COST.
[(d)] (E) The requirements of this section do not apply to the sale of any
cooperative interest in a unit which is to be used and occupied for nonresidential purposes.
Article – Real Property
11–135.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a contract for the resale of
a unit by a unit owner other than a developer is not enforceable unless the contract of sale
contains in conspicuous type a notice in the form specified in subsection (g)(1) of this
section, and the unit owner furnishes to the purchaser not later than 15 days prior to
closing:
(1) A copy of the declaration (other than the plats);
(2) The bylaws;
(3) The rules or regulations of the condominium;
(4) A certificate containing:
(i) A statement disclosing the effect on the proposed conveyance of
any right of first refusal or other restraint on the free alienability of the unit other than
any restraint created by the unit owner;

HOUSE BILL 1221
(ii) A statement setting forth the amount of the common expense
assessment and any unpaid common expense or special assessment adopted by the council
of unit owners that is due and payable from the selling unit owner;
(iii) A statement of any other fees payable by the unit owners to the
council of unit owners;
(iv) A statement of any capital expenditures approved by the council
of unit owners planned at the time of the conveyance which are not reflected in the current
operating budget disclosed under item (vi) of this item;
(v) The most recent regularly prepared balance sheet and income
expense statement, if any, of the condominium;
(vi) The current operating budget of the condominium including the
current reserve study report or a summary of the report, a statement of the status and
amount of any reserve or replacement fund, or a statement that there is no reserve fund;
(vii) A statement of any unsatisfied judgments or pending lawsuits to
which the council of unit owners is a party, excluding assessment collection suits;
(viii) A statement generally describing any insurance policies provided
for the benefit of unit owners, a notice that copies of the policies are available for inspection,
stating the location at which the copies are available, and a notice that the terms of the
policy prevail over the description;
(ix) A statement as to whether the council of unit owners has actual
knowledge of any violation of the health or building codes with respect to the common
elements of the condominium;
(x) A description of any recreational or other facilities which are to
be used by the unit owners or maintained by them or the council of unit owners, and a
statement as to whether or not they are to be a part of the common elements; and
(xi) 1. A statement as to whether the council of unit owners has
entered into any agreement that settles or releases the council of unit owners’ claims
related to common element warranties under § 11–131 of this title; and
2. A statement as to whether the board of directors has
disclosed to the council of unit owners in accordance with § 11–134.1(c)(2) of this title, the
board’s intention to enter into an agreement for the purpose of settling a disputed common
element warranty claim under § 11–131 of this title;
(5) A statement by the unit owner as to whether the unit owner has
knowledge:

HOUSE BILL 1221 7
(i) That any alteration to the unit or to the limited common
elements assigned to the unit violates any provision of the declaration, bylaws, or rules and
regulations;
(ii) Of any violation of the health or building codes with respect to
the unit or the limited common elements assigned to the unit;
(iii) That the unit is subject to an extended lease under § 11–137 of
this title or under local law, and if so, a copy of the lease must be provided; and
(iv) Of the presence of asbestos in the unit, including a description of
the location of the asbestos, and whether abatement has been performed in the unit during
the occupancy of the owner; and
(6) A written notice of the unit owner’s responsibility for the council of unit
owners’ property insurance deductible and the amount of the deductible.
(i) This section does not apply to the sale of any unit which is to be used and
occupied for nonresidential purposes.
(J) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A CONDOMINIUM SHALL MAINTAIN ON
THE CONDOMINIUM’S WEBSITE THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION, NOT INCLUDING INFORMATION PERTAINING TO AN
INDIVIDUAL UNIT.
(2) THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED IN A DOWNLOADABLE FORMAT AT NO COST.
[(j)] (K) Subsections (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), [and] (g), AND (J) of this section do
not apply to a sale of a unit in an action to foreclose a mortgage or deed of trust.
11B–106.
(b) The vendor shall provide the purchaser the following information in writing:
(1) A statement as to whether the lot is located within a development;
(2) (i) The current monthly fees or assessments imposed by the
homeowners association upon the lot;
(ii) The total amount of fees, assessments, and other charges
imposed by the homeowners association upon the lot during the prior fiscal year of the
homeowners association; and
(iii) A statement of whether any of the fees, assessments, or other
charges against the lot are delinquent;

HOUSE BILL 1221
(3) The name, address, and telephone number of the management agent of
the homeowners association, or other officer or agent authorized by the homeowners
association to provide to members of the public, information regarding the homeowners
association and the development, or a statement that no agent or officer is presently so
authorized by the homeowners association;
(4) A statement as to whether the owner has actual knowledge of:
(i) The existence of any unsatisfied judgments or pending lawsuits
against the homeowners association; and
(ii) Any pending claims, covenant violations actions, or notices of
default against the lot; and
(5) A copy of:
(i) The articles of incorporation, the declaration, and all recorded
covenants and restrictions of the primary development, and of other related developments
to the extent reasonably available, to which the purchaser shall become obligated on
becoming an owner of the lot, including a statement that these obligations are enforceable
against an owner’s tenants, if applicable; and
(ii) The bylaws and rules of the primary development, and of other
related developments to the extent reasonably available, to which the purchaser shall
become obligated on becoming an owner of the lot, including a statement that these
obligations are enforceable against an owner and the owner’s tenants, if applicable.
11B–111.11.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROPERTY MANAGEMENT COMPANY” MEANS AN
ENTITY ESTABLISHED TO GOVERN A PROPERTY SUBJECT TO AN INSTRUMENT THAT
IMPOSES ON LOTS OR ON THE OWNERS OR OCCUPANTS OF LOTS ANY MANDATORY
FEE IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROVISION OF SERVICES OR OTHERWISE FOR THE
BENEFIT OF SOME OR ALL OF THE LOTS.
(B) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION OR A
PROPERTY MANAGEMENT COMPANY FOR A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SHALL
MAINTAIN ON THE WEBSITE OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION OR PROPERTY
MANAGEMENT COMPANY ALL INFORMATION PERTAINING TO THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION REQUIRED UNDER § 11B–106(B) OF THIS TITLE, NOT INCLUDING
INFORMATION PERTAINING TO AN INDIVIDUAL LOT.
(2) THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED IN A DOWNLOADABLE FORMAT AT NO COST.

HOUSE BILL 1221 9
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.